Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 2 Vending Facilities on State Property

49-9-40.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“State property” means any building, land, or other real property owned, leased, or occupied by any department, commission, board, bureau, agency, public corporation, or other instrumentality of the state, including, but not limited to, the Georgia Building Authority, and any other real property in which the state has a legal or beneficial interest; provided, however, the term “state property” shall not include any property, real or personal, owned or leased or otherwise under the jurisdiction of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, the Georgia Education Authority (University), or any county or independent school system of this state.

“Vending facility” means vending stands, vending machines, snack bars, cart service, shelters, counters, and such other appropriate facilities and equipment as may be necessary for the sale of articles or services by licensed blind persons or other persons with disabilities, as prescribed by rules and regulations adopted by the agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

34-15-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-40

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-40 as present Code Section 49-9-40, and substituted “agency” for “department” at the end of paragraph (2).

49-9-41.
Declaration of public policy; income.

To effectuate the purposes of this article, it is declared to be public policy of the state that on any state property where the board determines it to be feasible to establish a vending facility to be operated by a licensed operator as provided in this article and where the agency or department or custodian of such property determines that such facility can be established without undue inconvenience to the operation being carried on in such state building or property, the preference accorded in this article shall require that such vending facility site not be deemed available for letting to competitive bidders for revenue-producing purposes unless the board declines to establish on such site a vending facility for blind persons or other persons with disabilities. The income to the agency or department or custodian controlling the space for such facility sites shall generally not be expected to exceed reimbursement for the cost of providing such facility site space and the services connected therewith; but in any case where such income exceeds those purposes, it shall be paid into the state treasury, subject to certification and audit.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-41, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-41

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-41 as present Code Section 49-9-41; in the first sentence of this Code section, substituted “board” for “Commissioner of Labor” near the beginning, and substituted “board” for “Commissioner” near the end; and inserted “or department or custodian” near the beginning of the second sentence.

49-9-42.
Operation of vending facilities on state property; preference for licensed disabled persons.

For the purpose of providing blind persons or other persons with disabilities with remunerative employment, enlarging their economic opportunities, and stimulating them to greater effort in striving to make themselves self-supporting, such blind persons or other persons with disabilities who are licensed by the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall be authorized to operate vending facilities on any state property where such vending facilities may be properly and satisfactorily operated by blind persons or other persons with disabilities. In authorizing the operation of vending facilities on state property, preference shall be given, so far as feasible, to blind persons or other persons with disabilities licensed by the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency as provided in this article; and the head of each department or agency in control of the maintenance, operation, and protection of state property shall, after consultation with the board and with the approval of the Governor, prescribe regulations designed to assure such preference (including assignment of vending machine income to achieve and protect such preference) for such licensed blind persons or other persons with disabilities without unduly inconveniencing such departments and agencies or adversely affecting the interests of the state.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-42, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-42

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-42 as present Code Section 49-9-42, substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor” in the first and second sentences, and substituted “board” for “Commissioner” near the middle of the second sentence.